Utah statutes.
68-3-14.   Annual reports -- Executive summary -- Electronic copy.

Whenever an annual report to the Legislature and to the governor, or to either one, is required by a statute in the Utah Code, that requirement may be fulfilled by:

(1)  sending an executive summary, highlighting the contents of the annual report and the address of the electronic or hard copy of the annual report to each legislator and to the governor, or to either one, as required by the statute;

(2)  providing an electronic copy of the annual report on the state's Internet site; and

(3)  providing the executive summary and the address of the electronic copy of the annual report to the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, if the annual report is required to be provided to the Legislature.



Amended by Chapter 254, 2010 General Session

